Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Offenders
§ 47-5-147.
Governor may authorize payment of reward for apprehension of escaped offender.

When an offender escapes from the custody of the department, the commissioner shall immediately notify the Governor who shall have exclusive power to authorize the payment of a reward, in his discretion, not exceeding Fifty Dollars ($50.00), out of any money available in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated, for the arrest and delivery of such offender to the proper authorities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7963; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 43; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 70; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 77; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 68; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 68, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-149.
United States offenders subject to the laws of the state.

If any offender of the United States courts who has been delivered to the custody of the department shall escape or attempt to escape, or shall commit any other crime while in the state correctional system, he shall be liable to the like punishment as if he had been convicted by the courts of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7978; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 58; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 71; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 78; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 69; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 69, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-151.
Death of prisoner; investigations, inquests, and autopsies; fees; penalties.

The superintendent (warden) or other person in charge of prisoners, upon the death of any prisoner under his care and control, shall at once notify the county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator (hereinafter “medical examiner”) of the county in which said prisoner died, of the death of the prisoner, and it shall be the duty of such medical examiner, when so notified of the death of such person, to obtain a court order and notify the State Medical Examiner of the death of such prisoner. It shall be mandatory that the State Medical Examiner cause an autopsy to be performed upon the body of the deceased prisoner. Furthermore, the State Medical Examiner shall investigate any case where a person is found dead on the premises of the correctional system, in accordance with Sections 41-61-51 through 41-61-79. The State Medical Examiner shall make a written report of his investigation, and shall furnish a copy of the same, including the autopsy report, to the superintendent (warden) and a copy of the same to the district attorney of the county in which said prisoner died. The copy so furnished to the district attorney shall be turned over by the district attorney to the grand jury, and it shall be the duty of the grand jury, if there be any suspicion of wrongdoing shown by the inquest papers, to thoroughly investigate the cause of such death.

It shall be the duty of the medical examiner of the county in which said prisoner died to arrange for the remains to be transported to the State Medical Examiner for said autopsy, and accompanying the remains shall be the court order for autopsy and any documents or records pertaining to the deceased prisoner, institutional health records or other information relating to the circumstances surrounding the prisoner’s death. The State Medical Examiner shall arrange for the remains to be transported to the county in which said prisoner died following completion of the autopsy. If the remains are not claimed for burial within forty-eight (48) hours after autopsy, then said remains may be delivered to the University of Mississippi Medical Center for use in medical research or anatomical study.

The provisions herein set forth in the first paragraph shall likewise apply to any case in which any person is found dead on the premises of the Mississippi State Penitentiary except that the autopsy to be performed on the body of such a person shall not be mandatory upon a person who is not a prisoner unless the medical examiner determines that the death resulted from circumstances raising questions as to the cause of death, in which case the medical examiner may cause an autopsy to be performed upon the body of such deceased person in the same manner as authorized to be performed upon the body of a deceased prisoner.

Provided further, that the provisions herein shall apply with respect to any deceased prisoner who at the time of death is being detained by duly constituted state authority such as the Oakley Youth Development Center, Mississippi State Hospital at Whitfield, East Mississippi State Hospital, or any other state institution.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a prisoner who was lawfully executed as provided in Sections 99-19-49 through 99-19-55.

Any officer or employee of the prison system or any other officer, employee or person having charge of any prisoner who shall fail to immediately notify the medical examiner of the death of such prisoner, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and by confinement in the county jail for not more than one (1) year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7948; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 28; Laws, 1971, ch. 432, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 515, § 1; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 79; Laws, 1983, ch. 391, § 1, ch. 499, § 26; Laws, 1984, ch. 448, § 8; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 70; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 70; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 33; Laws, 2010, ch. 554, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 47-5-153.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 70]

§ 47-5-155.
Discharged offenders revolving fund.

There is hereby created a special fund to be known as the “Discharged Offenders Revolving Fund” to be maintained in a bank to be selected by the commissioner. It shall be the duty of the bank, so long as it retains such deposits, to make monthly reports to the State Treasurer of the State of Mississippi as to the condition of the funds on deposit in the depository. Such funds shall be used for the prompt payment in cash to all discharged, pardoned or paroled offenders such amounts as are provided by Section 47-5-157. Upon the passage of this chapter, the Treasurer of the State of Mississippi shall transfer any funds in the State Treasury to the credit of the correctional system an amount which shall not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) to the Discharged Offenders Revolving Fund. The fund shall be replenished from time to time by the State Treasurer upon requisitions drawn by the commissioner which requisitions shall be supported by statements reflecting the names of the discharged offenders to whom payments have been made in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Upon receipt of adequately supported requisitions, the State Auditor shall draw his warrants made payable to the Discharged Offenders Revolving Fund against any funds in the State Treasury to the credit of the correctional system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7936; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 16; Laws, 1966, ch. 378, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 72; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 80; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 71; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 71, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-157.
Written discharge or release, clothing, Mississippi driver’s license or state identification card, money and bus ticket furnished to discharged or released offender.

When an offender is entitled to a discharge from the custody of the department, or is released therefrom on parole, pardon, or otherwise, the commissioner or his designee shall prepare and deliver to him a written discharge or release, as the case may be, dated and signed by him with seal annexed, giving the offender’s name, the name of the offense or offenses for which he was convicted, the term of sentence imposed and the date thereof, the county in which he was sentenced, the amount of commutation received, if any, the trade he has learned, if any, his proficiency in same, and such description of the offender as may be practicable and the discharge plan developed as required by law. At least fifteen (15) days prior to the release of an offender as described herein, the director of records of the department shall give the written notice which is required pursuant to Section 47-5-177. The offender shall be furnished, if needed, suitable civilian clothes, a Mississippi driver’s license, or a state identification card that is not a department-issued identification card and all money held to his credit by any official of the correctional system shall be delivered to him.

The amount of money which an offender is entitled to receive from the State of Mississippi when he is discharged from the state correctional system shall be determined as follows:

If he has continuously served his sentence in one (1) year or less flat time, he shall be given Fifteen Dollars ($15.00).

If he has served his sentence in more than one (1) year flat time and in less than ten (10) years flat time, he shall be given Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).

If he has continuously served his sentence in ten (10) or more years flat time, he shall be given Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00).

If he has continuously served his sentence in twenty (20) or more years flat time, he shall be given One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

There shall be given in addition to the above specified monies in subsections (a), (b), (c) and (d), a bus ticket to the county of conviction or to a state line of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7949; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 29; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 73; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 81; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 72; Laws, 1985, ch. 444, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 72; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-158.
Inmate Welfare Fund.

The department is authorized to maintain a bank account which shall be designated as the Inmate Welfare Fund. All monies now held in a similar fund or in a bank account or accounts for the benefit and welfare of inmates shall be deposited into the Inmate Welfare Fund. This fund shall be used for the benefit and welfare of inmates in the custody of the department and shall be expended in accordance with any provisions or restrictions in the regulations promulgated under subsection (7) of this section.

There shall be deposited into the Inmate Welfare Fund interest previously earned on inmate deposits, all net profits from the operation of inmate canteens, performances of the Penitentiary band, interest earned on the Inmate Welfare Fund and other revenues designated by the commissioner. All money shall be deposited into the Inmate Welfare Fund as provided in Section 7-9-21.

All inmate telephone call commissions shall be paid to the department. Monies in the fund may be expended by the department, upon requisition by the commissioner or his designee, only for the purposes established in this subsection.

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the inmate telephone call commissions shall be used to purchase and maintain telecommunication equipment to be used by the department.

Until July 1, 2008, twenty-five percent (25%) of the inmate telephone call commissions shall be deposited into the Prison Agricultural Enterprise Fund. Beginning on July 1, 2008, thirty-five percent (35%) of the inmate telephone call commissions shall be deposited into the Prison Agricultural Enterprise Fund. The department may use these funds to supplement the Prison Agricultural Enterprise Fund created in Section 47-5-66.

Forty percent (40%) of the inmate telephone call commissions shall be deposited into the Inmate Welfare Fund.

The commissioner may invest in the manner authorized by law any money in the Inmate Welfare Fund that is not necessary for immediate use, and the interest earned shall be deposited in the Inmate Welfare Fund.

The Deputy Commissioner for Administration and Finance shall establish and implement internal accounting controls for the Inmate Welfare Fund that comply with generally accepted accounting principles and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration. The Deputy Commissioner for Administration and Finance shall prepare and issue quarterly consolidated and individual facility financial statements to the prison auditor of the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review. The deputy commissioner shall prepare an annual report which shall include a summary of expenditures from the fund by major categories and by individual facility. This annual report shall be sent to the prison auditor, the Legislative Budget Office, the Chairman of the Corrections Committee of the Senate, and the Chairman of the Corrections Committee of the House of Representatives.

A portion of the Inmate Welfare Fund shall be deposited in the Discharged Offenders Revolving Fund, as created under Section 47-5-155, in amounts necessary to provide a balance not to exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) in the Discharged Offenders Revolving Fund, and shall be used to supplement those amounts paid to discharged, paroled or pardoned offenders from the department. The superintendent of the Parchman facility shall establish equitable criteria for the making of supplemental payments which shall not exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for any offender. The supplemental payments shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner. The State Treasurer shall not be required to replenish the Discharged Offenders Revolving Fund for the supplemental payments made to discharged, paroled or pardoned offenders.

The Inmate Welfare Fund Committee is hereby created and shall be composed of nine (9) members: The Deputy Commissioner for Community Corrections, the Deputy Commissioner of Institutions, the Superintendent of the Parchman facility, the Superintendent of the Rankin County facility, the Superintendent of the Greene County facility, the State Treasurer, the State Auditor, and two (2) members to be appointed by the Commissioner of Corrections, one (1) of whom must have a relative incarcerated by the department at the time of appointment and shall be a representative of inmate families. The commissioner shall appoint the chairman of the committee. The committee shall administer and supervise the operations and expenditures from the Inmate Welfare Fund and shall maintain an official minute book upon which shall be spread its authorization and approval for all such expenditures. The committee shall promulgate regulations governing the use and expenditures of the fund.

Regulations adopted shall set out what types of items shall be allowable purchases, and in all cases, the minutes of the committee shall explain which regulation permits any purchase it approves. Additionally, regulations of the committee shall prescribe the number of members necessary to constitute a quorum, minimum attendance requirements for a member to retain a seat on the committee, and a mission statement for the committee.

The committee shall conduct an annual needs assessment to determine what types of items should be purchased for the benefit of inmates. The needs assessments shall be conducted with the assistance of the department personnel, inmates and the families of inmates.

The committee shall evaluate the proposals of interested third parties for the administration of inmate canteen services as provided in Section 47-5-109.1.

The Department of Audit shall conduct an annual comprehensive special audit of the committee’s use of the Inmate Welfare Fund. The department shall incorporate in its special audit report any recommendations it has concerning the financial and management control practices of the committee. The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the Chairmen of the Senate and House Corrections Committees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 534, § 25; Laws, 1995, ch. 621, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 379, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 624, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 555, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 432, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§§ 47-5-159 through 47-5-171.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1982, ch. 431, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§47-5-159. [Laws, 1973, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 382, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 74; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 82]

§47-5-161. [Laws, 1973, ch. 483, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 382, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 75; Laws, 1978, ch. 400, § 9; Laws, 1979, ch. 462, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 83]

§47-5-163. [Laws, 1973, ch. 483, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 76; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 84]

§47-5-165. [Laws, 1973, ch. 483, § 4; Laws, 1975, ch. 382, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 77; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 85]

§47-5-167. [Laws, 1973, ch. 483, § 5; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 78; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 86]

§47-5-169. [Laws, 1973, ch. 483, § 6; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 87]

§47-5-171. [Laws, 1977, ch. 479, § 4; Laws, 1978, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 372, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1980, ch. 309; reenacted and amended Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 88; Laws, 1981, ch. 502, § 11]

§ 47-5-173.
Granting of leave for personal reasons.

The commissioner, or his designees, may grant leave to an offender and may take into consideration sickness or death in the offender’s family or the seeking of employment by the offender in connection with application for parole, for a period of time not to exceed ten (10) days. At least fifteen (15) days prior to the release of an offender on leave, the director of records of the department shall give the written notice required pursuant to Section 47-5-177. However, if an offender is granted leave because of sickness or death in the offender’s family, written notice shall not be required but the inmate shall be accompanied by a correctional officer or a law enforcement officer. In all other cases the commissioner, or his designees, shall provide required security when deemed necessary. The commissioner, or his designees, in granting leave, shall take into consideration the conduct and work performance of the offender.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 479, § 7; Laws, 1978, ch. 338, § 1 brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 89; Laws, 1982, ch. 431, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 73; Laws, 1985, ch. 444, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 73; Laws, 1996, ch. 373, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-175.
Agreements to transfer state offenders to federal facilities.

The Commissioner of Corrections, with the concurrence of the Governor, is hereby authorized to enter into agreements with appropriate federal agencies to provide housing and incarceration of persons convicted by the courts of Mississippi and sentenced to the Mississippi Department of Corrections by such courts under such terms and conditions as may be prescribed if a determination is made that the best interest of the State of Mississippi would be served by making such transfer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 412; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 74; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 74; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-177.
Notice requirements prior to release of offenders.

At least fifteen (15) days prior to the release of an offender from the custody of the department because of discharge, parole, pardon, temporary personal leave or pass, or otherwise, except for sickness or death in the offender’s family, the director of records of the department shall give written or electronic notice of such release to the sheriff of the county and to the chief of police of the municipality where the offender was convicted. If the offender is paroled to a county other than the county of conviction, the director of records shall give written or electronic notice of the release to the sheriff, district attorney and circuit judge of the county and to the chief of police of the municipality where the offender is paroled and to the sheriff of the county and to the chief of police of the municipality where the offender was convicted. The department shall notify the parole officer of the county where the offender is paroled or discharged to probation of any chronic mental disorder incurred by the offender, of any type of infectious disease for which the offender has been examined and treated, and of any medications provided to the offender for such conditions.

The commissioner shall require the director of records to clearly identify the notice of release of an offender who has been convicted of arson at any time. The fact that the offender to be released had been convicted of arson at any time shall appear prominently on the notice of release and the sheriff shall notify all officials who are responsible for investigation of arson within the county of such offender’s release and the chief of police shall notify all such officials within the municipality of such offender’s release.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 444, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 388; Laws, 1990, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-179.
Department of Corrections to deduct nonemergency medical expenses from inmate accounts.

The responsibility for paying the expenses of nonemergency medical care, treatment and medicine of an inmate is the responsibility of the inmate receiving the care, treatment and medicine.

The Department of Corrections is authorized to deduct the payment for nonemergency medical care, treatment and medicine from an inmate’s account and accept payment from other reimbursement programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 601, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 47-5-180.
Appointment of commissioner to make health-care decisions for offender who lacks capacity and does not have relative available; procedure; applicability of Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act.

The following words and phrases that are used in this section are defined in Section 41-41-203:advance health-care directive, agent, capacity, guardian, health-care decision, individual instruction, person, power of attorney for health care and surrogate.

For an offender who is a resident of Mississippi, the department may petition the chancery court of the county of residence of the offender to appoint the commissioner as guardian for an offender who lacks the capacity to make a health-care decision and who does not have a relative or other person available to make the decision.

The department may, consistent with Sections 41-41-201 through 41-41-229, provide an offender with the forms necessary to execute an advance health-care directive.

The department shall place an original or copy of the directive in the offender’s medical record, attach the directive to the offender’s commitment report and provide a copy of the directive to case management.

If a department physician determines that an offender’s life expectancy is less than one (1) year or that the offender is to undergo certain medical procedures to be determined by the department medical director, the department shall provide the offender with the opportunity to alter or execute a written advance health-care directive.

When the department provides an offender with the forms necessary to execute an advance health-care directive, Sections 41-41-201 through 41-41-229 and the following provisions apply:

Absent a court order to the contrary, an offender in the department’s custody shall not act as the agent, guardian or surrogate for the offender executing an advance health-care directive. But the principal offender may designate another offender as the agent, guardian or surrogate without judicial approval if the offenders are related by blood, marriage or adoption.

Absent a court order to the contrary, a department employee shall not act as the agent, guardian or surrogate for the offender executing an advance health-care directive. But the principal offender may designate a department employee as the agent, guardian or surrogate without judicial approval if the offender and the employee are related by blood, marriage or adoption.

In addition to the restrictions in Section 41-41-205, neither an offender in the department’s custody nor a department employee shall be used as a witness for a power of attorney for health care that an offender executes while in the department’s custody.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 529, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 47-5-181.
Conversion of community work centers to pre-release centers.

The Department of Corrections is authorized to convert four (4) community work centers to pre-release centers. The department shall convert the community work centers as follows: one (1) center in the northern part of the state, two (2) centers in the central part of the state, and one (1) center in the southern part of the state.

The department may place any inmate in a pre-release center if: (a) the inmate is within one (1) year of his or her earliest release date, and (b) the inmate is approved for placement by the classification hearing officer and the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee.

The department shall notify, by certified mail, each member of the board of supervisors of the county in which the center is located of the department’s intent to convert the community work center to a pre-release center. The board of supervisors shall have thirty (30) days after the date of the mailing to disapprove the conversion of the center. If the board of supervisors disapproves of the pre-release center, the department shall not convert the community work center.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 414, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 47-5-183.
Department of Corrections may create a
postconviction DNA database.

The Mississippi Department of Corrections is authorized, subject to the availability of funds, to secure a biological sample for purposes of DNA identification analysis from every individual convicted of a felony or in its custody before release from or transfer to a state correctional facility or county jail or other detention facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 459, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.